Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-206] Discontinuance and
replacement. If a group long-term care insurance policy is replaced by
another group long-term care insurance policy issued to the same policyholder,
the succeeding insurer shall offer coverage to all persons covered under the
previous group policy on its date of termination. Coverage provided or offered
to individuals by the insurer and premiums charged to person under the new
group policy shall not:

(1) Result in an exclusion for preexisting conditions
that would have been covered under the group policy being replaced; and

(2) Vary or otherwise depend on the individual's
health or disability status, claim experience, or use of long-term care
services. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next